cv_RU/cv_RU.aff
SFX B ӗ шӗрӗн/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳн/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 рӗн/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӳн/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗрӗн/RT и
SFX B 0 ӗн/RT [^еӗиӳт]
SFX B т чӗн/RT т
SFX B 0 ӗсем/P [^еӗиӳт]
SFX B т чӗсем/P т
SFX B е ин/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗн/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ вин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ син/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шин/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ ин/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӗн/RT и
SFX B 0 ӗме/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗмӗре/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ме/RT е
SFX B 0 мӗре/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗме/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗмӗре/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ вӗме/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗме/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗме/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗме/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗме/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗме/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗме/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗме/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗме/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗме/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗме/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗме/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗме/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗмӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗмӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗмӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗмӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗмӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗмӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗмӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗмӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗмӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗмӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗмӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗмӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗмӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B 0 ме/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 мӗре/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӗме/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗмӗре/RT и
SFX B 0 ӳне/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗре/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B е ӳне/RT е
SFX B е ӗре/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвне/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗре/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ вӳне/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӳне/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӳне/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӳне/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӳне/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӳне/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӳне/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӳне/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳне/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӳне/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӳне/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӳне/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӳне/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳне/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 ре/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӳне/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗре/RT и
SFX B 0 не/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B е ине/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвне/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ вине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шине/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ ине/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӗне/RT и
SFX B 0 ӗмре/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗмӗрте/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 мре/RT е
SFX B 0 мӗрте/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗмре/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗмӗрте/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ вӗмре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗмре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗмре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗмре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗмре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗмре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗмре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗмре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗмре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗмре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗмре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗмре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗмре/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗмӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗмӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗмӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗмӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗмӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗмӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗмӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗмӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗмӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗмӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗмӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗмӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗмӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B 0 мре/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 мӗрте/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӗмре/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗмӗрте/RT и
SFX B 0 ӳнче/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗрте/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B е ӳнче/RT е
SFX B е ӗрте/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӳнче/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗрте/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ вӳнче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӳнче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӳнче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӳнче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӳнче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӳнче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӳнче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӳнче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳнче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӳнче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӳнче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӳнче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӳнче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗрте/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ ӳнче/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 рте/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӳнче/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗрте/RT и
SFX B 0 ӗнче/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B е инче/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗнче/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ винче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кинче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ линче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ минче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нинче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пинче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ ринче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ синче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ инче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тинче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хинче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чинче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шинче/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ инче/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӗнче/RT и
SFX B 0 ӗнчи/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B е инчи/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗнчи/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ винчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кинчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ линчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ минчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нинчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пинчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ ринчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ синчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ инчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тинчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хинчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чинчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шинчи/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ инчи/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӗнчи/RT и
SFX B 0 ӗмрен/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 ӗмӗртен/RT [^еӗиӳ]
SFX B 0 мрен/RT е
SFX B 0 мӗртен/RT е
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗмрен/RT ӳ
SFX B ӳ ӗвӗмӗртен/RT ӳ
SFX B ӗ вӗмрен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗмрен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗмрен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗмрен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗмрен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗмрен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗмрен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗмрен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗмрен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗмрен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗмрен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗмрен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗмрен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B ӗ вӗмӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]вӗ
SFX B ӗ кӗмӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]кӗ
SFX B ӗ лӗмӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]лӗ
SFX B ӗ мӗмӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]мӗ
SFX B ӗ нӗмӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]нӗ
SFX B ӗ пӗмӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]пӗ
SFX B ӗ рӗмӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]рӗ
SFX B ӗ сӗмӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]сӗ
SFX B ӗ ӗмӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]ҫӗ
SFX B ӗ тӗмӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]тӗ
SFX B ӗ хӗмӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]хӗ
SFX B ӗ чӗмӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]чӗ
SFX B ӗ шӗмӗртен/RT [аеиуӗӑыӳэюя]шӗ
SFX B 0 мрен/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 мӗртен/RT [^аеиуӗӑӳэюя][вклмнпрсҫтхчш]ӗ
SFX B 0 йӗмрен/RT и
SFX B 0 йӗмӗртен/RT и
