cv_RU/cv_RU.dic
ҫӗҫӗ/B
ҫӗр/GB
ҫивӗт/B
ҫухатни/B
Ӗпхӳ/B
ӗҫлӗх/B
ӗҫченлӗх/B
ӗмӗтленни/B
ӗнӗк/FB
ӗненӳ/B
ӗнсе/B
ӗренкесӗрлӗх/B
ӗрчӗм/B
ӗшенчӗклӗх/B
Авдей/B
Акмантей/B
Алиме/B
Анатолий/B
Аркадий/B
Ахвантей/B
Башкири/B
Бразили/B
Ваҫтиер/B
Василий/B
Версаль/B
Гамби/B
Дани/B
Евпатори/B
Елей/B
Енетте/B
Енчепи/B
Ехветтӗр/B
Забайкалье/B
Иҫлентер/B
Илерпи/B
Илмет/B
Илтийер/B
Иля/B
Ипрахим/B
Искер/B
Итали/B
Йӗмпике/B
Кӗлшевер/B
Кӗнтепи/B
Калимчче/B
Карели/B
Катри/B
Керӳш/B
Комсомольски/B
Латви/B
Ломбарди/B
Мӗрел/B
Малайзи/B
Марине/B
Мати/B
Меланези/B
Мерти/B
Микихвер/B
Минкке/B
Михевер/B
Моисей/B
Мулентей/B
Нахичевань/B
Норманди/B
Паҫҫи/B
Пайтирэк/B
Патирек/B
Персей/B
Пикепи/B
Пинӗр/B
Пинесен/B
Пиньапи/B
Питтелей/B
Поль/B
Прибайкалье/B
Прусси/B
Рехиме/B
Сӗвенттей/B
Сӗнчек/B
Саватни/B
Савкапи/B
Савнеш/B
Савтирек/B
Самантей/B
Сармантей/B
Сахвантей/B
Сверне/B
Сене/B
Сентийер/B
Серби/B
Серпи/B
Сетнер/B
Силепи/B
Силпи/B
Сименке/B
Синепи/B
Ситемен/B
Скандинави/B
Суздаль/B
Тӑхтилет/B
Тайрине/B
Тверь/B
Теврине/B
Тернополь/B
Тимеккей/B
Тойтерек/B
Туймекеш/B
Туманик/B
Тутилет/B
Уҫментей/B
Ули/B
Унепи/B
Утеней/B
Ухатке/B
Филадельфи/B
Хӗвилкке/B
Хӗрсӗвер/B
Хамит/B
Хемите/B
Хуньтир/B
Шӑмапикке/B
Шелеме/B
Шеппи/B
Шернепи/B
Шехерчен/B
Элекҫей/B
Элккеней/B
Элтирек/B
Эпселем/B
Эрехметтей/B
Эсек/B
Эфиопи/B
Ялтирек/B
абстракци/B
авиастроени/B
авторалли/B
агровӗренӳ/B
академи/B
алаҫи/B
алхими/B
амуници/B
анестези/B
антипати/B
апперцепци/B
аргументаци/B
археологи/B
аслашшӗ/B
астрономи/B
аудитори/B
бактериологи/B
бинокль/B
бриджи/B
вӑйли/B
вӗҫевҫӗ/B
вӗҫсӗр/B
вӗлтренлӗх/B
вӗренӳлӗх/B
вӗрӳҫ/B
вӗткеленчӗк/FB
вӗчӗлти/B
валем/B
вегетаци/B
вермишель/B
вещани/B
виҫкӗтеслӗх/B
вилӗмсӗр/B
виркӗс/FB
витӗмлӗх/B
витленчӗк/B
возрождени/B
вуткасси/B
газовсарҫик/B
гастрономи/B
геологи/B
гидростанци/B
глушитель/B
графомани/B
дегенераци/B
дезориентаци/B
делегаци/B
демонстраци/B
децентрализаци/B
династи/B
диспансеризаци/B
дифференциаци/B
дополнени/B
евӗклӗх/B
ейкеленӳ/B
ен/B
ерҫӳ/FB
еткер/B
ещӗк/B
задани/B
звани/B
идентификаци/B
издани/B
икӗрчӗк/B
илӗртмӗш/B
иленкӗ/B
им/B
иммунизаци/B
инвентарь/B
индустриализаци/B
инструкци/B
интоксикаци/B
инъекци/B
ирӗклӗх/B
ирсӗрлӗх/B
исполнитель/B
ишӗлӳ/B
йӑпӑлти/B
йӗкӗт/B
йӗксӗк/B
йӗмлӗх/B
йӗпленчӗк/B
йӗрӗнчӗклӗх/B
йӗрлевҫӗ/B
йӗтер/B
йӳҫлӗх/B
йӳнсӗрлӗх/B
кӑмӑл/AB
кӗҫӗнни/B
кӗвелӗк/B
кӗлевҫӗ/B
кӗлмӗҫлӗх/B
кӗнекеҫӗ/B
кӗпӗрленчӗк/B
кӗрӗк/B
кӗрекеҫӗ/B
кӗрешӗн/B
кӗрленкӗ/B
кӗрпек/B
кӗскӗ/B
кӗсье/B
кӗтлӗх/B
кӗшӗл/B
кавир/B
какриш/B
калори/B
кальцинаци/B
каналйӗ/B
кантти/B
карбюраци/B
картишҫӗ/B
категори/B
кегель/B
киҫмӗк/B
килӗнтеш/B
килӗшӳлӗх/B
килӳ/B
кинодраматурги/B
кипӗт/B
кирлӗлӗх/B
кисретӳ/B
кишмиш/B
клинопись/B
колготки/B
командовани/B
коммуникаци/B
комсомольски/B
консерватори/B
консультаци/B
конференци/B
коньки/B
корреспонденци/B
краеведени/B
кристаллизаци/B
куҫкӗски/B
куматте/B
кусиле/B
кӳкӗрчен/B
кӳлленчӗк/B
кӳпчем/B
кӳштек/B
лӗкӗрти/B
лӗпӗш/B
лапӑсти/B
левӗр/B
лексикологи/B
лесничи/B
литпӗрлешӳ/B
лосось/B
мӑшӑлти/B
магнези/B
матти/B
мелке/B
меслет/B
мешӳрет/B
мимесӗр/B
мобилизаци/B
музыковедени/B
нӗрсӗрлӗх/B
начарри/B
никӗслевҫӗ/B
нӳхреп/B
омоними/B
отношени/B
пӗкӗрӗҫ/B
пӗлӳлӗх/B
пӗрлелӗх/B
пӗсехе/B
пӗчченлӗх/B
парнелӗх/B
пеккет/B
перфораци/B
пиелӗх/B
пин/B
пит/B
пичев/B
полимеризаци/B
постановлени/B
преступлени/B
проституци/B
пулек/B
пус/HB
пӳлӗм/B
пӳртен/B
радиотелеметри/B
ревальваци/B
резюме/B
репресси/B
ротаци/B
сӗнкӗлти/B
сӗткенлӗх/B
сапарпи/B
сенкерлӗх/B
сехет/AB
сиктӗрӗш/B
симуляци/B
сисӗмлӗх/B
соглашателлӗх/B
стабиллӗх/B
стипенди/B
супинккеҫӗ/B
сӳленкке/B
сӳтӗк/B
тӗкел/B
тӗмеске/B
тӗпренчӗк/B
тӗрӗссӗрлӗх/B
тӗрме/B
тӗшӗ/B
теветкеллӗх/B
тенкел/B
тетралоги/B
тикенек/B
типлӗх/B
тиркев/B
трагеди/B
тулти/B
тӳлем/B
тӳрккеслӗх/B
удостоверени/B
уреми/B
фантази/B
филологи/B
фотоӳкерчӗк/B
хӗвеллӗх/B
хӗрес/B
хӗсӗрлев/B
хатӗрлевҫӗ/B
хирӗлчӗк/B
хронологизаци/B
хӳтӗсӗрлӗх/B
чӑрӑлти/B
чӗлкӗм/B
чӗп/B
чӗркем/B
чеелӗх/B
черетленӳ/B
чикӗм/B
чунилли/B
шӑши/B
шампански/B
шеремет/B
шиксӗр/B
шӳкӗр/B
экономи/B
электризаци/B
элччӗ/B
эпи/B
эрне/B
эткерлӗх/B
Ӳмер/B
ӳпӗнчӗк/B
ӳрче/B
